Georgia, session 2025_26, HB255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 40-2-86 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to special license
plates promoting or supporting certain worthy agencies, funds, or nonprofit corporations with
proceeds disbursed to the general fund and the agency, fund, or nonprofit corporation, is
amended by adding new paragraphs to subsection (l) to read as follows:
"(71) A special license plate honoring Southern University Alumni. The funds raised by
the sale of this special license plate shall be disbursed to the Atlanta Metropolitan Chapter
of Southern University Alumni Federation of Georgia, Inc.
H. B. 255 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 39 4662S
(72) A special license plate honoring Delta Sigma Theta Sorority, Inc. The funds raised
by the sale of this special license plate shall be disbursed to the Delta Life Development
Center."
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(n) of the
Constitution of the State of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the
requisite two-thirds' majority vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 255 (SUB)
- 2 -